Maryland, session 2026, HB0296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.1.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, beginning in the 2023–2024
school year, each county board shall provide all students who meet the CCR standard
required under subsection (c) of this section with access to the following post college and
career readiness (post–CCR) pathways, at no cost to the student or the student’s parents,
including the cost of any fees:
(iii) A robust set of career and technology education programs that
are [recommended by the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee and] approved by the
CTE Committee and that allow students to complete:
1. A credit or noncredit certificate or license program, course,
or sequence of courses, including a program, course, or courses taken through dual
enrollment under § 15–127 of this article, at a secondary or postsecondary institution,
through an Advanced Placement course at a secondary institution, or through an
apprenticeship sponsor that leads to an industry recognized occupational–credential or
postsecondary certificate;
2. A registered apprenticeship program approved by the
Division of Workforce Development and Adult Learning within the Maryland Department
of Labor; or
3. A youth apprenticeship program, under Title 18, Subtitle
18 of this article.
21–209.
(a) There is a Career and Technical Education (CTE) Committee.
(b) (1) The CTE Committee is a unit within the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board, ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(2) The CTE Committee shall operate under the oversight of the
Accountability and Implementation Board, established under Title 5, Subtitle 4 of this
article.

HOUSE BILL 296 3
(c) (1) The purpose of the CTE Committee is to [build] DIRECT AND
COORDINATE THE DEVELOPMENT OF an integrated, globally competitive [framework]
AND ALIGNED SYSTEM for providing CTE to Maryland students in public schools,
institutions of postsecondary education, and the workforce.
(2) The CTE Committee shall strive to integrate CTE in secondary and
postsecondary institutions in the State.
(3) The CTE Committee shall consist of individuals who collectively reflect,
to the extent practicable, the INDUSTRIAL, geographical, racial, ethnic, cultural, and
gender diversity of the State.
(d) The CTE Committee is composed of the following members of the Governor’s
Workforce Development Board:
(1) The State Superintendent;
(2) The Secretary of Higher Education;
(3) The Secretary of Labor;
(4) The Secretary of Commerce; AND
(5) [The chair of the Skills Standards Advisory Committee, established
under § 21–208 of this subtitle; and
(6) The following six] SEVEN members, jointly selected by the Governor,
the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates, who collectively
represent:
(i) Employers;
(ii) Industry or trade associations;
(iii) Labor organizations;
(iv) Community colleges;
(v) The agricultural community; and
(vi) Experts in CTE programming.
(e) The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Delegates jointly shall appoint a chair of the CTE Committee from among the [committee’s
members] COMMITTEE MEMBERS WHO ARE EMPLOYER REPRESENTATIVES.

HOUSE BILL 296
(f) A member of the CTE Committee:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the CTE Committee; and
(2) Is not entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations for duties performed under this section.
(g) The CTE Committee may employ additional staff necessary to carry out the
committee’s functions as provided in the State budget.
(h) The CTE Committee shall perform the following duties:
(1) Develop a statewide framework for CTE that prepares students for
employment in a diverse, modern economy;
(2) Allocate roles and responsibilities to State agencies for the
credentialing of students, INCLUDING THOSE engaged in CTE programs;
(3) Adopt and, where appropriate, develop and regularly update, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE, a comprehensive and cohesive system
of [occupational skills] CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION, INCLUDING NECESSARY
SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, COMPETENCIES, AND CREDENTIALING standards, to drive the
State’s WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND CTE [system] SYSTEMS;
(4) Work with the business community, including nonprofit entities and
apprenticeship sponsors, to develop CTE learning opportunities;
(5) Bring together representatives from public schools, institutions of
postsecondary education, and the business community, including nonprofit entities and
apprenticeship sponsors, to ensure that CTE programs are aligned with the State’s
economic development and workforce goals and operate with best global practices;
(6) Set content qualification and recruitment standards for CTE
instructors;
(7) Determine which programs should be approved for credit towards high
school graduation requirements;
(8) [Approve, reject, or modify the proposals made by the CTE Skills
Standards Advisory Committee established under § 21–208 of this subtitle to establish CTE
programs for public school students;
(9)] Address operational issues associated with delivering CTE programs to
students, including transportation to and from job sites;

HOUSE BILL 296 5
[(10)] (9) Review agency budget proposals involving CTE and make
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on or before December 15 each year;
[(11)] (10) Monitor the progress of CTE in the State, including progress on
implementing the CTE goals in the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future;
[(12)] (11) Develop yearly goals for each county board to reach the statewide
goal under § 21–204 of this subtitle that 45% of public HIGH school students [achieve an]
COMPLETE THE HIGH SCHOOL LEVEL OF A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP OR
ANOTHER industry–recognized [occupational] credential before they graduate;
[(13)] (12) Track progress toward and perform any tasks necessary to
achieve the statewide goal under § 21–204 of this subtitle that 45% of public high school
students [achieve a youth apprenticeship or any other] COMPLETE THE HIGH SCHOOL
LEVEL OF A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP OR ANOTHER industry–recognized
[occupational] credential, AS DEFINED BY THE CTE COMMITTEE, before they graduate;
[(14)] (13) Establish, administer, and supervise the CTE Expert Review
Teams established under § 5–412 of this article;
[(15)] (14) Using State accountability data, identify schools to be
[investigated] REVIEWED by CTE Expert Review Teams in which sufficient numbers of
students or groups of demographically distinct students are not making adequate progress
towards the completion of the CTE pathway;
[(16)] (15) Submit to the Accountability and Implementation Board plans
for deploying CTE Expert Review Teams, and deploy the teams in accordance with
approved plans;
[(17)] (16) Share information on CTE education with the Accountability and
Implementation Board; [and]
(17) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS AND PROVIDE GUIDANCE ON SETTING
THE OCCUPATIONAL STANDARDS NECESSARY FOR A STRONG CTE SYSTEM THAT
SHALL FORM THE BASIS FOR THE POST–CCR CTE PATHWAY REQUIRED UNDER §
7–205.1(G)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE;
(18) IN COLLABORATION WITH AND SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF
THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD AND IN CONSULTATION
WITH OTHER INDUSTRY REPRESENTATIVES, DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF
HIGH–SKILL, HIGH–WAGE, OR IN–DEMAND PRIORITY OCCUPATIONS FOR THE STATE;
(19) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–211 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS TO STATE AGENCIES AND OFFICES, INCLUDING TO THE

HOUSE BILL 296
DEPARTMENT, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, THE MARYLAND HIGHER
EDUCATION COMMISSION, AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION
BOARD, ON ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STATE’S CTE SYSTEM TO ENSURE THE SYSTEM:
(I) REMAINS GLOBALLY COMPETITIVE;
(II) IS ADMINISTERED ACCORDING TO BEST GLOBAL
PRACTICES; AND
(III) WHEN INFORMING THE DESIGN OF COURSES AND
PROGRAMS OF STUDY, LEVERAGES THE CAREER PATHWAY AND OCCUPATIONAL
STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER § 21–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(18)] (20) Perform any other duties assigned by the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
(i) The CTE Committee may:
(1) Make grants to innovative programs developed by public schools,
institutions of postsecondary education, apprenticeship sponsors, nonprofits, and other
persons that help further the CTE Committee’s purpose;
(2) Contract with a public or private entity to research and analyze the
provision of CTE to students;
(3) Create advisory structures necessary to ensure essential input from
educators, parents, unions, employers, apprenticeship sponsors, community organizers,
local workforce boards, and other key stakeholders; and
(4) Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the committee’s duties and
administer CTE in the State.
(j) (1) A majority of CTE Committee members constitutes a quorum.
(2) Action by the CTE Committee requires the affirmative vote of a
majority of the committee members present.
(k) (1) Each year, the CTE Committee shall report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly, and the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(2) The CTE Committee’s report shall include:
(i) An annual assessment of the state of CTE within the State; and

HOUSE BILL 296 7
(ii) Statutory, regulatory, budgetary, and structural changes needed
to address the challenges of the evolving CTE system.
(3) Any student–level information in the CTE Committee’s report shall be
disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, family income level, linguistic status, and
disability status.
[21–210.
(a) In this section, “Advisory Committee” means the CTE Skills Standards
Advisory Committee.
(b) The CTE Committee shall create a CTE Skills Standards Advisory
Committee.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Advisory Committee is to make recommendations
and provide advice to the CTE Committee on setting the occupational standards necessary
for a strong CTE system.
(2) The recommendations made by the Advisory Committee shall form the
basis for the post–CCR CTE pathway required under § 7–205.1 of this article.
(d) (1) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of members appointed by
the chair of the CTE Committee that include employers, unions, apprenticeship sponsors,
and other experts on occupational skills, including agricultural skills.
(2) To the extent practicable, the Advisory Committee shall be composed of
members of the Governor’s Workforce Development Board who do not serve on the CTE
Committee.
(e) A member of the Advisory Committee:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Advisory Committee;
and
(2) Is not entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations for duties performed under this section.
(f) (1) The Advisory Committee shall make recommendations to the CTE
Committee concerning:
(i) A comprehensive array of career advancement guidelines,
including standards for each occupation in a profession and concrete steps and
accomplishments needed to progress to a greater skilled occupation in a given field;
(ii) Credentials to be issued at each stage of advancement and
criteria necessary to be awarded a particular credential; and

HOUSE BILL 296
(iii) Necessary adjustments to ensure that the State’s CTE system
remains globally competitive and administered according to best global practices.
(2) In making recommendations under this subsection, the Advisory
Committee shall strive to create a comprehensive, unified system of career progression
that:
(i) Is attuned to the State’s workforce needs;
(ii) Features integration among as many industries as possible;
(iii) Features performance assessments administered by industry
practitioners whenever possible;
(iv) Allows a student trained in one career to seamlessly transfer the
student’s skills and education to a new career in a different field;
(v) Seeks to incorporate as much education in a job setting as is
practicable;
(vi) Incorporates professional workplace soft skills, including
interpersonal and communication skills, time management, business etiquette, and use of
common business tools; and
(vii) Incorporates education in high school, community college, and
other postsecondary occupation programs into a seamless whole that will provide students
with credentials at various points that build on previous credentials.
(g) The terms, meeting times, procedures, and policies guiding removal of
members for the Advisory Committee shall be determined by the CTE Committee.]
21–210.
(A) (1) FOR EACH OCCUPATION ON THE LIST DEVELOPED UNDER §
21–209(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CTE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD,
COMPREHENSIVE, PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION.
(2) THE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION SHALL INCLUDE
INFORMATION ON:
(I) SKILL, KNOWLEDGE, COMPETENCY, EXPERIENCE, OR
CREDENTIAL STANDARDS FOR EACH OCCUPATION;

HOUSE BILL 296 9
(II) CONCRETE STEPS TO OBTAIN THE SKILLS, COMPETENCIES,
EXPERIENCES, OR CREDENTIALS NECESSARY TO ADVANCE ON A CAREER PATHWAY
OR TO HIGHER–PAYING ROLES IN A PROFESSION;
(III) CREDENTIALS TO BE ISSUED AT EACH STAGE OF CAREER
PATHWAY ADVANCEMENT; AND
(IV) NECESSARY CRITERIA TO BE AWARDED A CREDENTIAL.
(3) THE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION SHALL BE ADOPTED BY THE
GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD.
(B) ALL STATE AGENCIES AND RELEVANT WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION PROGRAMS SHALL USE THE LIST OF OCCUPATIONS DEVELOPED UNDER
§ 21–209(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION DEVELOPED
UNDER THIS SECTION AS A GUIDELINE FOR CURRICULUM ALIGNMENT,
CREDENTIALING, AND CAREER ADVANCEMENT.
21–211.
IN MAKING THE RECOMMENDATIONS REQUIRED UNDER § 21–209(H) OF THIS
SUBTITLE REGARDING ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STATE’S CTE SYSTEM, THE CTE
COMMITTEE SHALL STRIVE TO CREATE A COMPREHENSIVE, UNIFIED SYSTEM OF
CAREER PROGRESSION THAT:
(1) IS ATTUNED TO THE STATE’S WORKFORCE NEEDS;
(2) FEATURES INTEGRATION AMONG AS MANY INDUSTRIES AS
POSSIBLE;
(3) FEATURES PERFORMANCE ASSESSMENTS ADMINISTERED BY
INDUSTRY PRACTITIONERS WHENEVER POSSIBLE;
(4) ALLOWS A STUDENT TRAINED IN ONE CAREER TO SEAMLESSLY
TRANSFER THE STUDENT’S SKILLS AND EDUCATION TO A NEW CAREER IN A
DIFFERENT FIELD;
(5) INCORPORATES PROFESSIONAL WORKPLACE SOFT SKILLS,
INCLUDING INTERPERSONAL AND COMMUNICATION SKILLS, TIME MANAGEMENT,
BUSINESS ETIQUETTE, AND USE OF COMMON BUSINESS TOOLS; AND
(6) INCORPORATES EDUCATION IN HIGH SCHOOL, COMMUNITY
COLLEGE, AND OTHER POSTSECONDARY OCCUPATIONAL TRAINING PROGRAMS

HOUSE BILL 296
INTO A UNIFIED SYSTEM THAT WILL PROVIDE STUDENTS WITH CREDENTIALS AT
VARIOUS POINTS THAT BUILD ON PREVIOUS CREDENTIALS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.